Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-523
Organization; objections.

Any owner of real property in said proposed district who did not individually sign a petition for the organization of a reclamation district and who desires to object to the organization and incorporation of said district may, on or before the date set for the cause to be heard, file objection to the organization and incorporation of the district.

Laws 1947, c. 173, § 7(5), p. 530.